Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2212
Council; advise department; areas enumerated; serve as appeal panel.

The council shall advise the department regarding:

(1) The state plan on aging as developed and prepared by the department;

(2) Policies adopted by the department;

(3) The needs of the state's older individuals;

(4) The development of the state plan and policies which affect the state's older individuals;

(5) Such rules, regulations, and standards as may be adopted by the department; and

(6) A community aging services budget for submission to the Legislature by the department.

The council shall also act as a panel for the hearing and resolution of any appeal requested by an area agency on aging should the department disapprove the area plan and budget or amendments as submitted.

Laws 1982, LB 404, § 12;

Laws 1991, LB 58, § 14;

Laws 2026, LB867, § 28.
July 18, 2026